California statutes. Penal Code
(2) The director certifies in writing that the regulations apply to a pilot program that qualifies for exemption under this section. The certification shall include a description of the pilot program and of the methods the department will use to evaluate the results of the pilot program.

(3) The certification and regulations are filed with the Office of Administrative Law and the
 regulations are made available to the public by publication pursuant to subparagraph (F) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 6 of Title 1 of the California Code of Regulations.

(4) An estimate of fiscal impact is completed pursuant to Sections 6650 to 6670, inclusive, of the State Administrative Manual.

(c) The adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation pursuant to this section becomes effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(d) A regulation adopted pursuant to this section is repealed by operation of law, and the amendment or repeal of a regulation pursuant to this section is reversed by operation of law, two years after the commencement of the pilot program being implemented, unless the adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation is promulgated by the director pursuant to
 Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purpose of this subdivision, a pilot program commences on the date the first regulatory change implementing the program is filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 141, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.2.

(a) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a department action or policy implementing an action, that is based on a determination by the director that there is a compelling need for immediate action, and that unless the action is taken, serious injury, illness, or death is likely to result. The action, or the policy implementing the action, may be taken provided that the following conditions shall subsequently be met:

(1) A written determination of imminent danger shall be issued describing the compelling need and why the specific action or actions must be taken to address the compelling need.

(2) The written determination of imminent danger shall be mailed within 10 working days to every person who has filed a request for notice of regulatory actions with the department and to the Chief Clerk of the Assembly and the Secretary of the Senate for referral to the appropriate policy committees.

(b) Any policy in effect pursuant to a determination of imminent danger shall lapse by operation of law 15 calendar days after the date of the written determination of imminent danger unless an emergency regulation is filed with the Office of Administrative Law pursuant to Section 5058.3. This section shall in no way exempt the department from
 compliance with other provisions of law related to fiscal matters of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 141, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.3.

(a) Emergency adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation by the director shall be conducted pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, except with respect to the following:

(1) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, the initial effective period for an emergency adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation shall be 160 days.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code, no showing of emergency is necessary in order to adopt, amend, or repeal an emergency regulation if the director instead certifies, in a written statement filed with the Office of Administrative Law, that operational needs of the department require adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation on an emergency basis. The written statement shall include a description of the underlying facts and an explanation of the operational need to use the emergency rulemaking procedure. This paragraph provides an alternative to filing a statement of emergency pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. It does not preclude filing a statement of emergency. This paragraph only applies to the initial adoption and one readoption of an emergency regulation.

(3) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of
 Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be reviewed by the Office of Administrative Law within 20 calendar days after its submission. In conducting its review, the Office of Administrative Law shall accept and consider public comments for the first 10 calendar days of the review period. Copies of any comments received by the Office of Administrative Law shall be provided to the department.

(4) Regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) are not subject to the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in authorizing the deviations in this section from the requirements and procedures of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of
 the Government Code, to authorize the department to expedite the exercise of its power to implement regulations as its unique operational circumstances require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 713, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.4.

(a) The director shall provide for the development and implementation of a disciplinary matrix with offenses and associated punishments applicable to all department employees, in order to ensure notice and consistency statewide. The disciplinary matrix shall take into account aggravating and mitigating factors for establishing a just and proper penalty for the charged misconduct, as required by the California Supreme Court in Skelly v. State Personnel Board (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194. The presence of aggravating or mitigating factors may result in
 the imposition of a greater or a lesser penalty than might otherwise be mandated by the disciplinary matrix.

(b) The director shall adopt a code of conduct for all employees of the department.

(c) The director shall ensure that employees who have reported improper governmental activities and who request services from the department are informed of the services available to them.

(d) The department shall post the code of conduct in locations where employee notices are maintained. On July 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, the department shall send by electronic mail to its employees who have authorized access to electronic mail, the following:

(1) Information regarding the code of conduct.

(2) The duty to report misconduct.

(3) How to report misconduct.

(4) The duty to fully cooperate during investigations.

(5) Assurances against retaliation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 738, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.5.

In addition to the services rendered by physicians and surgeons, including psychiatrists, or by psychologists, pursuant to Sections 5068 and 5079, physicians and surgeons, including psychiatrists and psychologists, employed by, or under contract to provide mental health services to, the Department of Corrections may also provide the following medically or psychologically necessary services: prescreening of mental disorders; determination of the mental competency of inmates to participate in classification hearings; evaluation of parolees during temporary detention; determining whether mental health treatment
 should be a condition of parole; and such other services as may be required which are consistent with their licensure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1123, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.6.

The Director of the Department of Corrections shall have the authority of a head of a department set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 11181 of the Government Code to issue subpoenas as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall adopt regulations on the policies and guidelines for the issuance of subpoenas.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 5058.5 (as added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 695) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 53.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5058.7.

(a) The department shall approve an attorney’s request to have a confidential call with the inmate that they represent. The approved confidential call shall be at least 30 minutes once per month, per inmate, per
 case, unless the inmate or attorney requests less time.

(b) For purposes of this section, “confidential call” means a telephone call between an inmate and their attorney that both the inmate and attorney intend to be private.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 333, Sec. 1.   (AB 3043)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5059.

This title shall not affect the powers or jurisdiction of the Department of Transportation as to road camps pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 2760) of Chapter 5 of Title 1 of Part 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

5060.

The Director of Corrections may assist persons discharged, paroled, or otherwise released from confinement in an institution of the department and may secure employment for them, and for such purposes he may employ necessary officers and employees, may purchase tools, and give any other assistance that, in his judgment, he deems proper for the purpose of carrying out the objects and spirit of this section. Repayment of cash assistance received under this section from the current, or any prior appropriation, shall be credited to the appropriation current at time of such repayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1751.)
-------------------------------------------

5061.

Whenever any person confined in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections dies, and no demand or claim is made upon the director or his or her designee for the body of the deceased inmate by the inmate’s next of kin or legally appointed representative, the director shall dispose of the body by cremation or burial no sooner than 10 calendar days after the inmate’s death. The director or his or her designee may waive the 10-day waiting period for disposal of the deceased inmate’s body if confirmation is received that the
 inmate’s next of kin, or legally appointed representative, refuses to take possession of the body. If any personal funds or property of that person remains in the custody or possession of the Director of Corrections, the funds shall be applied to the payment of his or her cremation or burial expenses and related charges in an amount not exceeding those expenses and charges. If no demand or claim is made upon the director by the owner of the funds or property or his or her legally appointed representative, the director shall hold and dispose of those funds or property as follows:

(a) If the decedent leaves a will, the director shall, within 30 days after the date of death of the decedent, deliver the will to the clerk of the superior court having jurisdiction of the estate. If an executor is named in the will, the director shall furnish him or her written notice of the delivery of the will as provided in this section.

(b) All money or other personal property of the decedent remaining in the custody or possession of the director shall be held by him or her for a period of one year from the date of death of the decedent, for the benefit of the heirs, legatees or successors in interest of that decedent.

(c) Upon the expiration of the one-year period, any money remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director shall be delivered by him or her to the Treasurer for deposit in the Unclaimed Property Fund under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Upon the expiration of the one-year period, all personal property and documents of the decedent, other than cash, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director, shall be disposed of as
 follows:

(1) All deeds, contracts, or assignments shall be filed by the director with the public administrator of the county of commitment of the decedent.

(2) All other personal property shall be sold by the director at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale delivered by him or her to the Treasurer in the same manner as is provided in this section with respect to unclaimed money of the decedent. If he or she deems it expedient to do so, the director may accumulate the property of several decedents and sell the property in such lots as he or she may determine, provided that he or she makes a determination as to each decedent’s share of the proceeds.

(3) If any personal property of the decedent is not salable at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic
 value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify the deposit of the property in the State Treasury, the director may order it destroyed.

(4) All other unclaimed personal property of the decedent not disposed of as provided in paragraph (1), (2), or (3), shall be delivered by the director to the Controller for deposit in the State Treasury under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1440) of Chapter 6 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 805, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5062.

Whenever any person confined in any state institution subject to the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections escapes, or is discharged or paroled from that institution, and any personal funds or property of that person remains in the hands of the Director of Corrections, and no demand is made upon the director by the owner of the funds or property or his or her legally appointed representative, all money and other intangible personal property of the person, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining in the custody or possession of the director
 shall be held by him or her for a period of three years from the date of that escape, discharge, or parole, for the benefit of that person or his or her successors in interest.

Upon the expiration of the three-year period, any money and other intangible personal property, other than deeds, contracts, or assignments, remaining unclaimed in the custody or possession of the director shall be subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

Upon the expiration of one year from the date of that escape, discharge, or parole:

(a) All deeds, contracts, or assignments shall be filed by the director with the public administrator of the county of commitment of that person.

(b) All tangible personal property other than money, remaining
 unclaimed in his or her custody or possession, shall be sold by the director at public auction, or upon a sealed-bid basis, and the proceeds of the sale shall be held by him or her subject to Section 5008 and subject to Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure. If he or she deems it expedient to do so, the director may accumulate the property of several inmates and may sell the property in lots as he or she may determine, provided that he or she makes a determination as to each inmate’s share of the proceeds.

If any tangible personal property covered by this section is not salable at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or if it has no intrinsic value, or if its value is not sufficient to justify its retention by the director to be offered for sale at public auction or upon a sealed-bid basis at a later date, the director may order it destroyed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5063.

Before any money or other personal property or documents are delivered to the State Treasurer, State Controller, or public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 5061, and before any personal property or documents are delivered to the public administrator, or sold at auction or upon a sealed-bid basis, or destroyed, under the provisions of Section 5062, of this code, notice of said intended disposition shall be posted at least 30 days prior to the disposition, in a public place at the institution where the disposition is to be made, and a copy of such notice shall be mailed to the last known address of the
 owner or deceased owner, at least 30 days prior to such disposition. The notice prescribed by this section need not specifically describe each item of property to be disposed of.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1962.)
-------------------------------------------

5064.

At the time of delivering any money or other personal property to the Treasurer or Controller under Section 5061 or of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1500) of Chapter 7 of Title 10 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the director shall deliver to the Controller a schedule setting forth a statement and description of all money and other personal property delivered, and the name and last known address of the owner or deceased owner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

5065.

When any personal property has been destroyed as provided in Section 5061 or 5062, no suit shall thereafter be maintained by any person against the State or any officer thereof for or on account of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1708.)
-------------------------------------------

5065.5.

(a) A person or entity that enters into a contract with a criminal offender for the sale of the story of a crime for which the offender was convicted shall notify the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation that the parties have entered into a contract for sale of the offender’s story if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The offender’s conviction was for any offense specified in paragraph (1), except voluntary manslaughter, (2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (7), (9), (16), (17), (20), (22), (25), (34), or (35) of subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7.

(2) Subdivision (b) of Section 340.3 of the Code of Civil Procedure does not preclude commencement of a civil action against the criminal
 offender.

(b) Within 90 days of being notified, the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall notify the victim, or if the victim cannot be reasonably notified, a member of the victim’s immediate family, who has requested notification of the existence of a contract described by this section.

(c) For purposes of this section, “member of the victim’s immediate family” means a spouse, child, parent, sibling, grandchild, or grandparent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 241.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5066.

The Director of Corrections shall expand the existing prison ombudsman program to ensure the comprehensive deployment of ombudsmen throughout the state prison system with specific focus on the maximum security institutions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 149.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

5068.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Incarcerated person’s home” means a place where the incarcerated person’s spouse, parents, or children reside at the time of commitment or at the time of a review of an incarcerated person’s classification or housing assignment.

(2) “Reasonable” includes consideration of the safety of the incarcerated person and the
 institution.

(3) “Reassign” means to transfer an incarcerated person’s housing assignment from one institution to another.

(b) (1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall evaluate a person who is newly committed to a state prison. The evaluation shall include the investigation of all pertinent circumstances of the person’s life, including the existence of any strong community and family ties, the maintenance of which may aid in the person’s rehabilitation, and the antecedents of the violation of law because of which the
 person has been committed to prison.

(2) An incarcerated person’s placement may be reevaluated to determine whether existing orders and dispositions should be modified or continued in force, including, but not limited to, whether a child described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) has moved to a place significantly nearer to an otherwise suitable and appropriate institution.

(c) (1) The secretary shall classify incarcerated persons based on the
 evaluations described in subdivision (b), and when reasonable, the secretary shall assign or reassign an incarcerated person to the institution of the appropriate security level and gender population nearest the incarcerated person’s home, unless other classification factors make that placement unreasonable.

(2) (A) If the incarcerated person has a parent and child relationship with a child under 18 years of age, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 7610) of Part 3 of Division 12 of the Family Code, or is a guardian or relative caregiver as defined in Section 17550 of the Family Code, the secretary shall place the person in the correctional institution or facility that is located
 nearest to the primary place of residence of the person’s child, provided that the placement is suitable and appropriate, would facilitate increased contact between the person and their child, and the incarcerated parent gives their consent to the placement.

(B) An incarcerated person may request a review of their housing assignment when there is a change in the primary place of residence of the person’s child upon which the person’s housing assignment was based.

(C) If
 an incarcerated person has more than one child under 18 years of age, the department shall make a separate determination for each individual child.

(d) When the diagnostic study of an incarcerated person committed to an indeterminate sentence pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1168 indicates the need for a psychiatric or psychological evaluation, the secretary shall cause a psychiatric or psychological report to be prepared for the Board of Parole Hearings prior to the release of the incarcerated person. The report shall be prepared by a psychiatrist or psychologist licensed to practice in this state.

(e) Before the release of an incarcerated person committed under subdivision (b) of Section 1168, the secretary shall provide the Board of Parole Hearings with a written
 evaluation of the incarcerated person.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 98, Sec. 2.   (AB 1226)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5068.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), any person employed or under contract to provide diagnostic, treatment, or other mental health services in the state or to supervise or provide consultation on these services in the state correctional system shall be a physician and surgeon, a psychologist, or other health or mental health professional, licensed to practice in this state.

(b) Notwithstanding Section
 5068, the following persons are exempt from the requirements of subdivision (a), so long as they continue in employment in the same class and in the same department:

(1) Persons employed on January 1, 1985, as psychologists to provide diagnostic or treatment services, including those persons on authorized leave, but not including intermittent personnel.

(2) Persons employed on January 1, 1989, to supervise or provide consultation on the diagnostic or treatment services, including persons on authorized leave, but not including intermittent personnel.

(c) (1) (A) The requirements of subdivision (a) may be waived by the secretary solely for persons in the professions of
 psychology, clinical social work, marriage and family therapy, or professional clinical counseling who are gaining qualifying experience for licensure in those professions in this state. Providers working in a licensed health care facility operated by the department shall also obtain a waiver in accordance with Section 1277 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) For the purposes of this paragraph, “qualifying experience” means experience that satisfies the requirements of
 Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900), Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 4980), Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 4991), or Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 4999.10) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A waiver granted pursuant to this subdivision shall not exceed four years from commencement of the employment in this state in a position that includes qualifying experience, at which time licensure shall have been obtained or the employment shall be terminated, except that an extension of a waiver of licensure may be granted for one additional year, based on extenuating circumstances determined by the department pursuant to subdivision (d). For persons employed as
 psychologists, clinical social workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors less than full time, an extension of a waiver of licensure may be granted for additional years proportional to the extent of part-time employment, as long as the person is employed without interruption in service, but in no case shall the waiver of licensure exceed five years in the case of psychologists or six years in the case of clinical social
 workers, marriage and family therapists, or professional clinical counselors. However, this durational limitation upon waivers shall not apply to active candidates for a doctoral degree in social work, social welfare, or social science who are enrolled at an accredited university, college, or professional school, but these limitations shall apply following completion of that training.

(3) A waiver pursuant to this subdivision shall be granted only to the extent necessary to qualify for licensure, except that personnel recruited for employment from outside this state and whose experience is sufficient to gain admission to a licensure examination shall nevertheless have one year from the date of their employment in California to become licensed, at which time licensure shall have been obtained or the employment shall be terminated, provided that the employee shall take the licensure examination at the
 earliest possible date after the date of the employee’s employment, and if the employee does not pass the examination at that time, the employee shall have a second opportunity to pass the next possible examination, subject to the one-year limit.

(d) The department shall grant a request for an extension of a waiver of licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) based on extenuating circumstances if any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The person requesting the extension has experienced a recent catastrophic event that may impair the person’s ability to qualify for and pass the licensure examination. Those events may include, but are not limited to, significant hardship caused by a natural disaster; serious and prolonged illness of the person; serious and prolonged illness or death of a child, spouse, or parent; or other stressful circumstances.

(2) The person requesting the extension has difficulty speaking or writing the English language, or other cultural and ethnic factors exist that substantially impair the person’s ability to qualify for and pass the license examination.

(3) The person requesting the extension has experienced other personal hardship that the department, in its discretion, determines to warrant the extension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 10, Sec. 8.   (AB 134)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5069.

(a) The administrative director of the Division of Industrial Accidents shall formulate procedures for the selection and orderly referral of injured inmates of state penal or correctional institutions who may be benefited by rehabilitation services and retrained for other positions upon release from incarceration. The State Department of Rehabilitation shall cooperate in both designing and monitoring results of rehabilitation programs for the disabled inmates. The primary purpose of this section is to rehabilitate injured inmates in order that they might engage in suitable and gainful employment upon their release.

(b) The director shall notify the injured inmate of the availability of rehabilitation services in those cases where there is continuing disability of 28 days and beyond. A copy of such notification shall be forwarded to the State Department of Rehabilitation.

(c) The initiation of a rehabilitation plan shall be the responsibility of the director.

(d) Upon establishment of a rehabilitation plan, the injured inmate shall cooperate in carrying it out.

(e) The injured inmate shall receive such medical and vocational rehabilitative services as may be reasonably necessary to restore him to suitable employment. 

(f) The injured inmate’s rehabilitation benefit is an additional benefit and shall not
 be converted to or replace any workmen’s compensation benefit available to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1347.)
-------------------------------------------

5070.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sex of a prison inmate shall not prevent the Director of Corrections from assigning any prison inmate to academic or vocational training programs situated in correctional institutions established for the incarceration of offenders of the opposite sex.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 685.)
-------------------------------------------

5071.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not assign any prison inmate to employment that provides that inmate with access to personal information of private individuals, including, but not limited to, the following: addresses; telephone numbers; health insurance, taxpayer, school, or employee identification numbers; mothers’ maiden names; demand deposit account, debit card, credit card, savings account, or checking account numbers, PINs, or passwords; social security numbers; places of employment; dates of birth; state- or government-issued driver’s license or identification numbers; United States Citizenship and Immigration Services-assigned numbers; government passport
 numbers; unique biometric data, such as fingerprints, facial scan identifiers, voice prints, retina or iris images, or other similar identifiers; unique electronic identification numbers; address or routing codes; and telecommunication identifying information or access devices.

(b) Any person who is a prison inmate, and who has access to any personal information, shall disclose that they are a prison inmate before taking any personal information from anyone.

(c) This section shall not apply to inmates in employment programs or public service facilities where incidental contact with personal information may occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 51.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5072.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of Health Care Services may develop a process to maximize federal financial participation for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services rendered to individuals who, but for their institutional status as inmates, are otherwise eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to Chapter 7
 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or a Low Income Health Program (LIHP) pursuant to Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 15909) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Federal reimbursement for acute inpatient hospital services for inmates enrolled in Medi-Cal shall occur through the State Department of Health Care Services and federal reimbursement for acute inpatient hospital services for inmates not enrolled in Medi-Cal but who are eligible for a LIHP shall occur through a county LIHP.

(c) (1) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in conjunction with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall develop a process to claim federal financial participation and to reimburse the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for the federal share of the
 allowable Medicaid cost provision of acute inpatient hospital services rendered to inmates according to this section and for any administrative costs incurred in support of those services.

(2) Public or community hospitals shall invoice the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to obtain reimbursement for acute inpatient hospital services in accordance with contracted rates of reimbursement, or if no contract is in place, the rates pursuant to Section 5023.5. The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall reimburse a public or community hospital for the delivery of acute inpatient hospital services rendered to an inmate pursuant to this section. For individuals eligible for Medi-Cal pursuant to this section, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a quarterly invoice to the State Department of Health Care Services for claiming federal participation at the Medi-Cal rate for acute inpatient hospital services.
 For enrollees in the LIHP, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall submit a quarterly invoice to the county of last legal residence pursuant to Section 14053.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The county shall submit the invoice to the State Department of Health Care Services for claiming federal financial participation for acute inpatient hospital services for individuals made eligible pursuant to this section, pursuant to Section 14053.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and pursuant to the process developed in subdivision (b). The State Department of Health Care Services shall claim federal participation for eligible services for LIHP enrolled inmates at the rate paid by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The State Department of Health Care Services and counties shall remit funds received for federal participation to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation for allowable costs incurred as a result of delivering acute inpatient hospital services allowable
 under this section.

(3) The county LIHPs shall not experience any additional net expenditures of county funds due to the provision of services under this section.

(4) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall reimburse the State Department of Health Care Services and counties for administrative costs that are not reimbursed by the federal government.

(5) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall reimburse the State Department of Health Care Services for any disallowance that is required to be returned to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for any litigation costs incurred due to the implementation of this section.

(d) (1) The state shall indemnify and hold harmless participating entities that
 operate a LIHP, including all counties, and all counties that operate in a consortium that participates as a LIHP, against any and all losses, including, but not limited to, claims, demands, liabilities, court costs, judgments, or obligations, due to the implementation of this section as directed by the secretary and the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) The State Department of Health Care Services may at its discretion require a county, as a condition of participation as a LIHP, to enroll an eligible inmate into its LIHP if the county is the inmate’s county of last legal residence.

(3) The county LIHPs shall be held harmless by the state for any disallowance or deferral if federal action is taken due to the implementation of this section in accord with the state’s policies, directions, and requirements.

(e) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in conjunction with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall develop a process to facilitate eligibility determinations for individuals who may be eligible for Medi-Cal or a LIHP pursuant to this section and Section 14053.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall assist inmates in completing either the Medi-Cal or LIHP application as appropriate and shall forward that application to the State Department of Health Care Services for processing.

(3) Notwithstanding any other state law, and only to the extent that federal law allows and federal financial participation is available, for the limited purpose of implementing this section, the department or its designee is authorized to act on behalf of an inmate for purposes of
 applying for or determinations of Medi-Cal or LIHP eligibility.

(f) (1) This section does not restrict or limit the eligibility or alter county responsibility for payment of any service delivered to a parolee who has been released from detention or incarceration and now resides in a county that participates in the LIHP. If otherwise eligible for the county’s LIHP, the LIHP shall enroll the parolee.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), at the option of the state, for enrolled parolees who have been released from detention or incarceration and now reside in a county that participates in a LIHP, the LIHP shall reimburse providers for the delivery of services which are otherwise the responsibility of the state to provide. Payment for these medical services, including both the state and federal shares of reimbursement, shall be included as part of the reimbursement
 process described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(3) Enrollment of individuals in a LIHP under this subdivision shall be subject to any enrollment limitations described in subdivision (h) of Section 15910 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) The department shall be responsible to the LIHP for the nonfederal share of any reimbursement made for the provision of acute inpatient hospital services rendered to inmates pursuant to this section.

(h) Reimbursement pursuant to this section shall be limited to those acute inpatient hospital services for which federal financial participation pursuant to Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act is allowed.

(i) This section shall have no force or effect if there is a final judicial determination made
 by any state or federal court that is not appealed, or by a court of appellate jurisdiction that is not further appealed, in any action by any party, or a final determination by the administrator of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, that limits or affects the department’s authority to select the hospitals used to provide inpatient hospital services to inmates.

(j) It is the intent of the Legislature that the implementation of this section will result in state General Fund savings for the funding of acute inpatient hospital services provided to inmates along with any related administrative costs.
